Massachusetts, session 194th, H2625.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3 of chapter 22E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
official edition, is hereby amended by striking the text thereof, and inserting in place thereof
following: -
“Any person who is arrested by virtue of process, or is taken into custody by an officer
and charged with the commission of a felony, and who upon arrest has been arraigned pursuant
to the applicable court rules under the Massachusetts Rules of Criminal Procedure, shall submit a
DNA sample to the department. The sample shall be collected by a person authorized under
section 4 of this chapter subsequent to arraignment, in accordance with regulations or procedures
established by the director. The results of such sample shall be made part of the state DNA
database.
of 2

Section 2. Section 12 of chapter 22E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2004
official edition, is hereby amended in line 7 by striking out the words “$1,000” and inserting in
its place thereof the following words:- $2,000. Said section is further amended in line 8 by
striking out the words “six months” and inserting in place thereof the following words: - one
year.
Section 3. Section 13 of chapter 22E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2004
official edition, is hereby amended by striking in line 4 the words “$1,000” and inserting in its
place thereof the following words:- $2,000. Said section is further amended in line 5 by striking
out the words “six months” and inserting in place thereof the following words: - one year.
Section 4 . Section 15 of chapter 22E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2004
official edition, is hereby amended in line 3 by adding after the word “expunged” the following:-
“ if the original offense upon which the collection of DNA is based does not result in a
conviction; or”
of 2